Utah statutes.
63B-15-301.   Authorizations to construct capital facilities using institutional or agency funds.

(1)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the University of Utah may use donations and other institutional funds to plan, design, and construct an addition to and remodel of the David Eccles School of Business facilities under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may request state funds for operations and maintenance to the extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of Regents policy R710.

(2)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  Snow College may use donations and other institutional funds to plan, design, and construct a Traditional Building Skills Institute facility under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the college may request state funds for operations and maintenance to the extent that the college is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of Regents policy R710.

(3)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the Utah National Guard may use federal funds to plan, design, and construct Building #4 for the Joint Logistics Training Center under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the National Guard may not request state funds for operations and maintenance.



Enacted by Chapter 169, 2006 General Session

